Maryland, session 2025, HB1063.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
20–104.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb1063*

HOUSE BILL 1063
(a) The Commission shall provide an opportunity for a hearing before proceeding
with the design or construction of a water supply or sanitary sewer system.
(b) Subject to subsection (c) of this section, the Commission:
(1) shall advertise in newspapers and technical media that the Commission
considers appropriate for bids or proposals for design or construction services for any part
of a water supply or sanitary sewer system; and
(2) may readvertise any part of the services needed if the Commission
considers the prices quoted in response to a prior advertisement to be unreasonable.
(c) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, the Commission may use
day labor to complete any part of the design or construction of a water supply or sanitary
sewer system.
(2) Notwithstanding § 20–105(a) of this subtitle, the Commission may
spend up to $15,000 for day labor for any part of construction services without advertising
for or receiving bids or proposals.
(d) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, the Commission
may enter into any type of contract under this subtitle that promotes the best interest of
the Commission.
(2) The Commission:
(i) may not enter a cost–plus–percentage–of–cost contract; and
(ii) shall prohibit a cost–plus–percentage–of–cost subcontract under
a contract with the Commission.
(e) [The Commission may only enter into a design/build contract for a facilities
construction contract with costs exceeding $2,000,000.
(f)] The Commission may reject any bid or proposal.
[(g)] (F) (1) The Commission may require a contract to be secured by bonds,
penalties, and conditions.
(2) Security authorized under this subsection is enforceable in any court of
competent jurisdiction.
[(h)] (G) The Commission:
(1) may adopt regulations to establish:

HOUSE BILL 1063 3
(I) a prequalification process for bidders or offerors; and
(II) ALTERNATIVE PROJECT DELIVERY AND SOLICITATION
METHODS THAT PROMOTE THE BEST INTERESTS OF THE COMMISSION; AND
(2) shall adopt regulations to govern discussions held with offerors under §
20–105(c)(3) of this subtitle.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.